Washington statutes.
RCW 43.270.070

Community suggestions.

The department of commerce shall ask communities for suggestions on state practices, policies, and priorities that would help communities implement their strategies against alcohol, tobacco, or other drug abuse, or violence. The department of commerce shall review and respond to those suggestions making necessary changes where feasible, making recommendations to the legislature where appropriate, and providing an explanation as to why suggested changes cannot be accomplished, if the suggestions cannot be acted upon.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2076; 2001 c 48 s 3; 1989 c 271 s 321.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.